Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1353.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-127 of Title 70, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving


fund for the State Department of Education to be designated the


“Menstrual Products for Schools Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be


a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall


consist of all monies received by the Department from gifts, grants,


donations, bequests, and state appropriations provided for the


purpose of implementing the provisions of subsection B of this

Req. No. 2684 Page 1


section. All monies accruing to the credit of the fund are hereby


appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the Department for


the purpose provided for in this subsection. Expenditures from the


fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer


against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the


Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and


payment.


B. Subject to the availability of funding, the State Department


of Education shall utilize the Menstrual Products for Schools


Revolving Fund created in subsection A of this section to assist


each school district and public charter school in this state in


making menstrual products available, at no cost, in school restrooms


designated for use by females and single-occupancy restrooms.


C. For the purposes of this section, “menstrual products” means


tampons and sanitary napkins for use in connection with the


menstrual cycle.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2684 EB 12/30/2025 1:56:32 PM



Req. No. 2684 Page 2